Utah statutes.
20A-8-103.   Petition procedures.

(1)  As used in this section, the proposed name or emblem of a registered political party is "distinguishable" if a reasonable person of average intelligence will be able to perceive a difference between the proposed name or emblem and any name or emblem currently being used by another registered political party.

(2)  To become a registered political party, an organization of registered voters that is not a continuing political party shall:

(a)  circulate a petition seeking registered political party status beginning no earlier than the date of the statewide canvass held after the last regular general election and ending no later than the February 15 of the year in which the next regular general election will be held; and

(b)  file a petition with the lieutenant governor that is signed by at least 2,000 registered voters on or before February 15 of the year in which a regular general election will be held.

(3)  The petition shall:

(a)  state that the signers are or desire to become members of the designated party or group;

(b)  state the name, which may not exceed four words, and identify the emblem of the party or group;

(c)  state the process that the organization will follow to organize and adopt a constitution and bylaws; and

(d)  be signed by a filing officer, who agrees to receive communications on behalf of the organization.

(4)  The lieutenant governor shall:

(a)  determine whether or not the required number of voters appears on the petition;

(b)  review the proposed name and emblem to determine if they are "distinguishable" from the names and emblems of other registered political parties; and

(c)  certify his findings to the filing officer of the group within 30 days of the filing of the petition.

(5) (a)  If the lieutenant governor determines that the petition meets the requirements of this section, and that the proposed name and emblem are distinguishable, he shall authorize the filing officer to organize the prospective political party.

(b)  If the lieutenant governor finds that the name, emblem, or both are not distinguishable from the names and emblems of other registered political parties, the lieutenant governor shall notify the filing officer that he has seven days to submit a new name or emblem to the lieutenant governor.

(6)  A registered political party may not change its name or emblem during the regular general election cycle.

